Hawaii statutes.
§325-9 Quarantine without removal; duty of
police officers to assist in removals and enforcement of quarantine. If
the department of health or its agent determines that the removal of the person
infected or suspected of being infected would directly and seriously aggravate
the disease so as to endanger the person's life, the department, or its agent
may make provision for the person, as directed in section 325-8, in the house
in which the person may be; and, in such case, the department or its agent may cause
the persons in the neighborhood to be removed, and may take such other measures
as it judges necessary for the public health and safety. The department or its
agent, in effecting any removal or quarantine under this section or section
325-8, may require any sheriff, deputy sheriff, chief of police, or police
officer to aid and assist it, and such force as is reasonably necessary to
effect any such removal or quarantine may be used.

Every sheriff, deputy sheriff, chief of police,
or police officer who is so required to aid and assist the department or its
agent shall immediately aid and assist it. [PC 1869, c 59, §27; RL 1935, §1096;
am L 1941, c 262, §2; RL 1945, §2308; RL 1955, §49-9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§19; HRS §325-9; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am
L 2005, c 29, §1; am L 2006, c 38, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next